Massachusetts, session 194th, S1250.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 59H of chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the section in its entirety and inserting in place
thereof the following new section:-
Section 59H. Strategic Litigation Against Public Participation; Special Motion to Dismiss
(a) In any case in which a party asserts that the civil claims, counterclaims, or cross
claims against it are based, either in whole or in part, on its exercise of freedom of expression,
freedom of speech or freedom of petition under the Constitution of the United States or the
constitution of the commonwealth, the party may bring a special motion to dismiss.
(b) The court shall advance any such special motion so that it may be heard and
determined as expeditiously as possible. For those claims or allegations that are based on
of 3

protected speech activity, the court shall grant such special motion, unless the party against
whom such special motion is made shows that: (i) the moving party’s exercise of its right to the
freedom of petition, the freedom of speech, the freedom of expression or in connection with any
matter of public concern, either acting solely or in concert with other citizens, was devoid of any
reasonable factual support or any arguable basis in law; and (ii) the moving party’s acts caused
actual injury to the responding party. In making its determination, the court shall consider the
pleadings and supporting and opposing affidavits stating the facts upon which the liability or
defense is based.
(c) The attorney general, on their behalf or on behalf of any government agency or
subdivision to which the moving party’s acts were directed, may intervene to defend or
otherwise support the moving party on such special motion.
(d) All discovery proceedings shall be stayed upon the filing of a special motion to
dismiss pursuant to this section; provided, however, that the court, on motion and after a hearing
and for good cause shown, may order that limited, specified discovery on the motion may be
conducted. The stay of discovery shall remain in effect until notice of entry of the order ruling on
the special motion.
(e) The special motion to dismiss may be filed within 60 days of the service of the
complaint or, in the court’s discretion, at any later time upon terms it deems proper.
(f) If the court grants a special motion to dismiss filed pursuant to this section, the court
shall award the moving party all costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees, including those incurred
for the special motion and any related discovery matters. Nothing in this section shall affect the
right of the moving party to any remedy otherwise authorized by law.
of 3

(g) As used in paragraph (b) of this section, the phrase “freedom of petition, the freedom
of speech, the freedom of expression” means those rights as defined under the United States
Constitution or the constitution of the commonwealth.
(h) As used in paragraph (b) of this section, the term “any matter of public concern” shall
include any written or verbal statement that is recorded, displayed or distributed in person or via
any form of media, concerning any topic or subject related to a good, product, or service in the
marketplace or otherwise offered to the public.
of 3